Arkansas, session 2025, HB1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-14-904(b)(1)(A)(ii), concerning the
procedure for appropriations by a quorum court, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(c) If a quorum court does not pass an annual
appropriation ordinance as required under subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii)(a) of
this section, expenditures of the county, including without limitation the
payment of salaries to employees, shall continue to be paid under the annual
appropriation ordinance from the previous year until a new annual
appropriation ordinance is adopted.

*SSS124*
01/30/2025 2:15:40 PM SSS124

HB1331
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that when a county quorum court
does not pass an annual appropriation ordinance the county cannot provide
basic services and the county employees cannot be paid; that this act will
allow expenditures to be paid until an annual appropriation ordinance is in
place; that the lack of an appropriation ordinance makes it impossible for
the county to provide necessary services to the citizens of the county, which
threatens the public peace, health, and safety of the residents of the
county; and that this act is immediately necessary because failure to pass an
annual appropriation ordinance puts county employees in financial distress
and at risk of being unable to pay for financial responsibilities. Therefore,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary
for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
















01/30/2025 2:15:40 PM SSS124